New York, session 2025-2026, A7877.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 8-600 of the 2 election law, as amended by chapter 781 of the laws of 2021, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (b) [The largest] At least one city in the county or, if there is no 5 city in the county, the municipality with the highest population in each 6 county based on the latest federal decennial census or the county seat, 7 or the county seat in Washington county, shall have at least one polling 8 place designated for early voting, and to the extent practicable if such 9 city or municipality has public transportation routes, such polling 10 place shall be situated along such transportation routes. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05116-01-5